Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.680

Ballots—Violation.

(1) A person who willfully violates any provision of chapter 29A.40 RCW regarding the assertion or declaration of qualifications to receive or cast a ballot or unlawfully casts a ballot is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

(2) Except as provided in this chapter, a person who willfully violates any other provision of chapter 29A.40 RCW is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 10 s 76. Prior: 2003 c 111 s 2136; 2003 c 53 s 179; 2001 c 241 s 14; 1994 c 269 s 2; 1991 c 81 s 34; 1987 c 346 s 20; 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 9. Formerly RCW 29.36.370, 29.36.160.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.

Tampering with registration form or ballot declaration: RCW 29A.84.050.